test/src/morphology/N-kuolban_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kuõlbân a-stem: # Noun 'kangasmaa' - full paradigm
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Nom: kuõlbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Gen: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Acc: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Ill: kuõlbbna
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Loc: kuõlbbnest
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Com: kuõlbbnin
     kuõlbân+N+Ess: kuõlbânan
     kuõlbân+N+Par: kuõlbânad
     kuõlbân+N+Sg+Abe: kuõlbbntää
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Nom: kuõlbbân
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Gen: kuõlbbni
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Acc: kuõlbbnid
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Ill: kuõlbbnid
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Loc: kuõlbbnin
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Com: kuõlbbnivuiˊm
     kuõlbân+N+Pl+Abe: kuõlbbnâitää
